Kentucky, session 2025RS, SB199.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 411 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Consortium" means the right to the services, assistance, aid, society, or
companionship between a parent and his or her child; and
(b) "Total and permanent disability" means the inability to do any substantial
gainful activity by reason of any medically determinable physical or mental
impairment which can be expected to result in death or which has lasted or
can be expected to last for a continuous period of not less than twelve (12)
months.
(2) A child may recover damages against a third person for loss of consortium
resulting from a negligent or wrongful act of the third person when the act
caused the death or total and permanent disability of a parent.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 12/20/2024 1:49 PM Jacketed